Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 Wardens, Superintendents, and Other Personnel

Cross references.

Indemnification of prison guards, and other personnel for death or disablement in line of duty, § 45-9-80 et seq.

42-5-30.
Qualifications for wardens, superintendents, and other personnel; appointment of wardens of county correctional institutions.

The board shall by rule and regulation define the qualifications for wardens, superintendents, and other personnel employed in the state and county correctional institutions. The board shall by rule and regulation specify appropriate titles of personnel so employed, but no such personnel shall be known as or designated by the board as “guards” or “prison guards.” The wardens and deputy wardens of the various county correctional institutions shall be appointed by the governing authority of the county, subject to approval of the board, and shall serve at the pleasure of the county or the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 18; Ga. L. 1984, p. 639, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 417, § 1.

42-5-31.
Oath of office of wardens and superintendents, their deputies, and other correctional officers.

Before entering upon the duties of their office, wardens and superintendents, their deputies, and other correctional officers or employees shall take and subscribe, before some officer authorized to administer oaths, the following oath:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support and defend the Constitutions of the United States of America and the State of Georgia and that I will faithfully perform and discharge the duties of my office conscientiously and without malice or partiality, to the best of my ability. So help me God.”

History.

Penal Code 1910, § 1197; Code 1933, § 77-311; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1155, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 639, § 2.

42-5-32.
Bonds of superintendents, wardens, and other officials and employees.

Before any state or county correctional institution or other facility operating under the jurisdiction of the board shall be approved to receive inmates, the board shall require the warden, superintendent, or other chief custodial officer of the institution to execute a bond, in an amount as the board may require, with good securities to be approved by it, such bond to be not less than $10,000.00, payable to the Governor and his successors in office and conditioned upon the following:

To account faithfully for all public and other funds or property coming into the principal’s custody, control, care, or possession; and

To discharge truly and faithfully all the duties imposed upon him by law or by the rules and regulations of the board.

The board may also require that any other officials, employees, or agents of the department or of the various penal institutions referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section shall give bond as referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section, in an amount to be determined by the board, but in no case to be less than $5,000.00.

All bonds given under this Code section shall be liable for any breach of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section by a deputy, agent, or subordinate of the principal, whether expressed therein or not; and all such bonds shall be subject to and governed by all the provisions of Chapter 4 of Title 45 which are not in conflict with this Code section. The costs of bonds obtained for wardens and other officials or employees of the county correctional institutions shall be paid for by the county. The costs of bonds obtained for superintendents and other officials or employees of the state correctional institutions and of the department shall be paid for by the state.

History.

Penal Code 1910, § 1197; Code 1933, § 77-311; Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 20; Ga. L. 1957, p. 477, § 5.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, T. 45, C. 4.

42-5-33.
Submission of monthly reports to commissioner by wardens and superintendents.

The wardens or superintendents of all state or county correctional institutions shall send monthly reports to the commissioner showing the names of all inmates held in custody.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 26.

42-5-34.
Powers of arrest of wardens, superintendents, and deputies.

Wardens and superintendents shall have authority to deputize any person in their employ. Wardens, superintendents, and their deputies are legally constituted arresting officers, with or without warrants, for the purpose of arresting persons violating Code Sections 42-5-14 through 42-5-18. Any person resisting arrest shall be dealt with as the law directs for resisting an officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1961, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1170, § 1.

42-5-35.
Conferral of police powers; authorization to assist local law enforcement officers or correctional officers; retention of badge.

The commissioner may confer all powers of a police officer of this state, including, but not limited to, the power to make summary arrests for violations of any of the criminal laws of this state and the power to carry weapons, upon wardens of county correctional institutions and upon persons in the commissioner’s employment as the commissioner deems necessary, provided that individuals so designated meet the requirements specified in all applicable laws.

The commissioner or his designee may authorize certain persons in his employment to assist law enforcement officers or correctional officers of local governments in preserving order and peace when so requested by such local authorities.

Correctional employees leaving the service of the department under honorable conditions who have accumulated 25 or more years of service with the department as a certified peace officer or who are killed in the line of duty shall be entitled as part of such employee’s compensation to retain his or her department issued badge or have such badge given to his or her surviving family member. If a correctional employee serving in a certified position leaves the service of the department due to a disability that arose in the line of duty and the disability prevents the employee from working as a law enforcement officer, then the employee shall be entitled as part of such employee’s compensation to retain his or her department issued badge regardless of his or her number of years of service with the department. The board is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 161, § 19; Ga. L. 1972, p. 599, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1246, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 672, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1170, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 454, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 464, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 274, § 1/SB 235.

42-5-36.
Confidentiality of certain information related to inmates; certain information classified as state secrets; declassification; exception; records custodians; penalties for breach.

Officials and employees of the department shall respect the confidential nature of information supplied by inmates who cooperate in remedying abuses and wrongdoing in the penal system. Any official or employee who breaks such a confidence and thereby subjects a cooperating inmate to physical jeopardy or harassment shall be subject to suspension or discharge.

Investigation reports and intelligence data prepared by the Internal Investigations Unit of the department shall be classified as confidential state secrets and privileged under law, unless declassified in writing by the commissioner.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Dangerous sexual offense” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 42-1-12.

“Serious offense” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 42-9-42.

“Serious violent felony” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 17-10-6.1.

All institutional inmate files and central office inmate files of the department shall be classified as confidential state secrets and privileged under law, unless declassified in writing by the commissioner; provided, however, that:

Except for medical records, this subsection shall not apply to information requested by the district attorney of the circuit in which the inmate was sentenced for a serious violent felony or sentenced for a dangerous sexual offense against a person less than 18 years of age for purposes of such district attorney submitting information or filing a written objection under Code Section 42-9-43;

The commissioner shall furnish the records provided for under division (i) of this subparagraph that were created on and after January 31, 2010, upon receipt of the request for such records from the district attorney, and such request shall state that the records are sought for purposes of submitting information or filing a written objection under Code Section 42-9-43; and

Any record provided for under this subparagraph shall be held in confidence by the district attorney and shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 and shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (f) of this Code section.

These records shall be subject to subpoena by a court of competent jurisdiction of this state; and

The commissioner shall prepare a report of the conduct of record of any inmate serving a sentence for a serious violent felony. When the report includes conduct which would constitute a serious offense, reasonably related information connected to such offense shall be included in the report. Such report shall be subject to disclosure under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 42-9-43.

As used in this subsection, the term “identifying information” means any records or information that reveals a name, residential or business address, residential or business telephone number, day and month of birth, social security number, or professional qualifications.

The identifying information of any person or entity who participates in or administers the execution of a death sentence and the identifying information of any person or entity that manufactures, supplies, compounds, or prescribes the drugs, medical supplies, or medical equipment utilized in the execution of a death sentence shall be confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50 or under judicial process. Such information shall be classified as a confidential state secret.

The commissioner shall designate members of the department to be the official custodians of the records of the department. The custodians may certify copies or compilations, including extracts thereof, of the records of the department. Subject to the provisions of this Code section, in response to a subpoena or upon the request of any appropriate government or judicial official, the department may provide a duly authenticated copy of any record or other document. This authenticated copy may consist of a photocopy or computer printout of the requested document certified by the commissioner or his or her duly authorized representative.

No person shall divulge or cause to be divulged in any manner any confidential state secret. Any person violating this Code section or any person who causes or procures a violation of this Code section or conspires to violate this Code section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1399, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 680, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1361, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 851, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 1056, § 1A/HB 122; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-4/SB 174; Ga. L. 2021, p. 91, § 1/HB 168.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added subsection (d); and redesignated former subsection (d) as present subsection (e).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions, which read: “(c) All institutional inmate files and central office inmate files of the department shall be classified as confidential state secrets and privileged under law, unless declassified in writing by the commissioner; provided, however, these records shall be subject to subpoena by a court of competent jurisdiction of this state.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (c), added subparagraph (c)(1)(A), redesignated former subparagraphs (c)(1)(A) and (c)(1)(B) as present subparagraphs (c)(1)(B) and (c)(1)(C), respectively, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (c)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “All institutional inmate files and central office inmate files of the department shall be classified as confidential state secrets and privileged under law, unless declassified in writing by the commissioner; provided, however, that these records shall be subject to subpoena by a court of competent jurisdiction of this state and provided, further, that the commissioner shall prepare a report of the conduct of record of any inmate serving a sentence for a serious violent felony. When the report includes conduct which would constitute a serious offense, reasonably related information connected to such offense shall be included in the report. Such report shall be subject to disclosure under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 42-9-43.”; and added subsection (f).

Cross references.

Privileged communications generally, §

24-5-501

et seq.

Inspection of public records generally, §

50-18-70

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 230 (1997).

For article, “Death Penalty,” see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 51 (2014).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-5-37.
Employees in control of inmates prohibited from receiving profit from inmate labor; penalties.

No warden, superintendent, deputy, inspector, physician, or any officer or other employee who has charge, control, or direction of inmates shall be interested in any manner whatever in the work or profit of the labor of any inmate; nor shall any such personnel receive any pay, gift, gratuity, or favor of a valuable character from any person interested, either directly or indirectly, in such labor.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for a term of not less than two years and not more than five years. The offense may be reduced to a misdemeanor by recommendation of the jury trying the case, if the court concurs in the jury’s recommendation. In addition, a person who violates subsection (a) of this Code section shall be summarily discharged from the service of the state by the department.

This Code section shall not prohibit a part-time professional employee from the regular practice of his profession.

History.

Ga. L. 1908, p. 1119, § 11; Penal Code 1910, § 1196; Code 1933, § 77-9906; Ga. L. 1984, p. 639, § 3.

42-5-37.1.
Compensation of employees of institutions operated by department for damages to wearing apparel caused by inmate action.

As used in this Code section, the term “wearing apparel” means eyeglasses, hearing aids, clothing, and similar items worn on the person of the employee.

When action by an inmate in one of the penal institutions operated by the department results in damage to an item of wearing apparel of an employee of the institution, the department shall compensate the employee for the loss in the amount of the repair cost, the replacement value, or the cost of the item of wearing apparel, whichever is less.

Such losses shall be compensated only in accordance with procedures to be established by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1429, § 1.

42-5-38.
Making false statement as to age to procure employment.

Any person who makes a false statement as to his age in order to procure employment as a correctional officer, warden, superintendent, or other employee shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1908, p. 1119, § 10; Penal Code 1910, § 1193; Code 1933, § 77-9905.

42-5-39.
Refusal by officer to receive inmates in correctional institution.

If the superintendent or warden of a state or county correctional institution or other officer or person employed therein whose duty it is to receive inmates fails or refuses to do so, he shall be punished by confinement not exceeding ten years and shall be dismissed from office.

History.

Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 807; Code 1863, § 4381; Code 1868, § 4419; Code 1873, § 4487; Code 1882, § 4487; Penal Code 1895, § 286; Penal Code 1910, § 290; Code 1933, § 77-9903.

42-5-40.
Requiring inmates to do unnecessary work on Sunday.

Any superintendent, warden, or other correctional official who causes any inmate to do any work on Sunday, except works of necessity, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1908, p. 1119, § 14; Penal Code 1910, § 420; Code 1933, § 26-6909; Code 1933, § 26-9909, enacted by Ga. L. 1968, p. 1249, § 1.

Law reviews.

For comment criticizing judicial intervention in Brown v. Teel, 236 A.2d 699 (N.H. 1967), and advocating deference to legislative determination of Sunday business law, see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 445 (1968).

For comment on Hughes v. Reynolds,

223 Ga. 727

,

157 S.E.2d 746

(1967), holding the Sunday Business Activities Act of 1967 (Code 1933, Ch. 96-8) unconstitutional, see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 479 (1968).

42-5-41.
[Repealed] Compensation of department employee injured by inmate or probationer.

History.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 1113, § 1. For current provisions regarding compensation of department employees injured in the line of duty by an act of external violence, see Code Section 45-7-9; repealed by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1491, § 2, effective July 1, 1986.